Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Chapter 5. Notice, Parties, and Representation in Estate Litigation and Other Matters

§ 201.
Repealed.
1985, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 163.

§ 202.
When parties bound by others.

In judicial proceedings involving trusts under this title or estates of decedents, minors, or persons under guardianship, the following apply:

Persons are bound by orders binding others in the following cases:

Orders binding the sole holder or all co-holders of a power of revocation or a presently exercisable general power of appointment, including one in the form of a power of amendment, bind other persons to the extent their interests (as objects, takers in default, or otherwise) are subject to the power.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between them or among persons represented, orders binding a guardian bind the person whose estate he or she controls; orders binding a trustee bind beneficiaries of the trust in proceedings to probate a will establishing or adding to a trust, to review the acts or accounts of a prior fiduciary and in proceedings involving creditors or other third parties; and orders binding a personal representative bind persons interested in the undistributed assets of a decedent’s estate in actions or proceedings by or against the estate. If there is no conflict of interest and no guardian has been appointed, a parent may represent his or her minor child.

An unborn or unascertained person who is not otherwise represented is bound by an order to the extent his or her interest is adequately represented by another party having a substantially identical interest in the proceeding.

At any point in a proceeding, a Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interest of a minor, an incapacitated, unborn, or unascertained person, or a person whose identity or address is unknown, if the court determines that representation of the interest otherwise would be inadequate. If not precluded by conflict of interests, a guardian ad litem may be appointed to represent several persons or interests. The court shall set out its reasons for appointing a guardian ad litem as a part of the record of the proceeding.

Parties shall be those persons so defined by the Rules of Probate Procedure.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2009, No. 20

, § 6;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 203.
Probate proceedings; service; jurisdiction over persons.

In proceedings within the exclusive jurisdiction of the Probate Division of the Superior Court where notice is required, interested persons may be bound by the orders of the court in respect to property in or subject to the laws of this State by notice in conformity with law or the Rules of Probate Procedure. An order is binding as to all who are given notice of the proceeding though less than all interested persons are notified.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 121, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 204.
Definitions.

As used in this title:

“Interested person” includes heirs, devisees, legatees, children, spouses, creditors, beneficiaries, and any others having a property right in or claim against a trust estate or the estate of a decedent, or person under guardianship that may be affected by the proceeding. It also includes persons having priority for appointment as executor or administrator, and other fiduciaries representing interested persons. The parties at commencement of a probate proceeding shall include all interested persons. The meaning as it relates to particular persons may vary from time to time and shall be determined by the Rules of Probate Procedure.

“Fiduciary” includes executor, administrator, special administrator, trustee, conservator, guardian of a minor, guardian of a spendthrift, voluntary guardian of a person who has an infirmity and total or limited guardian of an adult with a developmental disability, but excludes one who is merely a guardian ad litem.

“Special fiduciary” means an individual appointed as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure to assume the duties of a fiduciary suspended by the court.

“Executor” includes administrator with the will annexed.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 62.